Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 2
LIMITATIONS ON AGREEMENTS
AND PRACTICES

5-3-201. Security in sales or leases.

With respect to a consumer credit sale, a creditor may take a security interest in the property sold. In addition, a creditor may take a security interest in goods upon which services are performed or to which goods sold are annexed, or in land to which the goods are affixed or that is maintained, repaired, or improved as a result of the sale of the goods or services, if in the case of a security interest in land the debt secured is three thousand dollars or more, or in the case of a security interest in goods the debt secured is one thousand dollars or more. Except as provided with respect to cross-collateral described in section 5-3-202, a creditor may not otherwise take a security interest in property of the consumer to secure the debt arising from a consumer credit sale.

With respect to a consumer lease, a creditor may not take a security interest in property of the consumer to secure the debt arising from the lease. This subsection (2) does not apply to a security deposit for a consumer lease.

A security interest taken in violation of this section is void.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1218, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-407, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-3-202. Cross-collateral.

In addition to contracting for a security interest pursuant to the provisions on security in sales or leases contained in section 5-3-201, a seller in a consumer credit sale may secure the debt arising from the sale by contracting for a security interest in other property if as a result of a prior sale the seller has an existing security interest in the other property. The seller may also contract for a security interest in the property sold in the subsequent sale as security for the previous debt.

If the seller contracts for a security interest in other property pursuant to this section, the rate of finance charge thereafter on the aggregate unpaid balances so secured may not exceed that permitted if the balances so secured were consolidated pursuant to the provisions on consolidation involving a refinancing contained in section 5-2-205 (1). The seller has a reasonable time after so contracting to make any adjustments required by this section. "Seller" in this section does not include an assignee not related to the original seller.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1218, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-408, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-3-203. Debt secured by cross-collateral.

If debts arising from two or more consumer credit sales, other than sales pursuant to a revolving credit account, are secured by cross-collateral or consolidated into one debt payable on a single schedule of payments and the debt is secured by security interests taken with respect to one or more of the sales, payments received by the seller after the taking of the cross-collateral or the consolidation are deemed, for the purpose of determining the amount of the debt secured by the various security interests, to have been applied first to the payment of the debts arising from the sales first made. To the extent debts are paid according to this section, security interests in items of property terminate as the debts originally incurred with respect to each item are paid.

Payments received by the seller upon a revolving credit account are deemed, for the purpose of determining the amount of the debt secured by the various security interests, to have been applied first to the payment of finance charges in the order of their entry to the account and then to the payment of debts in the order in which the entries to the account showing the debts were made.

If the debts consolidated arose from two or more sales made on the same day, payments received by the seller are deemed, for the purpose of determining the amount of the debt secured by the various security interests, to have been applied first to the payment of the smallest debt.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1219, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-409, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-3-204. Restrictions on interest in land as security.

With respect to a consumer loan in which the amount financed is three thousand dollars or less, a lender may not contract for an interest in land as security. A security interest taken in violation of this section is void.

For the purposes of this section, on revolving credit accounts, the amount financed shall be determined by the limit in the amount of credit made available to or for the account of the consumer if that limit is established by an express written agreement by the lender and if the lender does not retain the right to unilaterally reduce that credit limit, except in the event of default.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1219, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-3-510, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-3-205. Use of multiple agreements.

A creditor may not use multiple agreements with respect to a single consumer credit transaction for the purpose of obtaining a higher finance charge than would otherwise be permitted by this code or to avoid disclosure of an annual percentage rate pursuant to the provisions on disclosure and advertising. Dividing a single consumer credit transaction between a husband and wife shall be presumed to be a violation of this section. The excess amount of finance charge provided for in agreements in violation of this section is an excess charge for the purposes of the provisions on the effect of violations on rights of parties contained in section 5-5-201 and the provisions on civil actions by the administrator contained in section 5-6-114.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1219, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 5-2-402 and 5-3-409, as they existed prior to 2000.

5-3-206. No assignment of earnings.

A creditor may not take an assignment of earnings of the consumer for payment or as security for payment of a debt arising out of a consumer credit transaction. An assignment of earnings in violation of this section is unenforceable by the assignee of the earnings and revocable by the consumer.

A sale of unpaid earnings made in consideration of the payment of money to or for the account of the seller of the earnings is deemed to be a loan to him or her secured by an assignment of earnings.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1220, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 5-2-410 and 5-3-403, as they existed prior to 2000.

5-3-207. Authorization to confess judgment prohibited.

A consumer may not authorize any person to confess judgment on a claim arising out of a consumer credit transaction. An authorization in violation of this section is void.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1220, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 5-2-415 and 5-3-407, as they existed prior to 2000.

5-3-208. Balloon payments.

With respect to a consumer credit transaction other than one pursuant to a revolving credit account, if any scheduled payment is more than twice as large as the average of all other regularly scheduled payments, the consumer has the right to refinance the amount of that payment at the time it is due at the creditor's prevailing rates for such type of transaction if the consumer meets the creditor's normal credit standards and if the creditor is, at that time, in the business of making such transactions. The creditor shall disclose this right in writing to the consumer at the time the transaction is entered into. These provisions do not apply to the extent that the payment schedule is adjusted to the seasonal or irregular income of the consumer. This section shall not apply to a transaction of a class defined by rule of the administrator promulgated in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., as not requiring for the protection of the consumer his or her right to refinance as provided in this section.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1220, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 5-2-405 and 5-3-402, as they existed prior to 2000.

5-3-209. Referral sales.

With respect to a consumer credit sale or consumer lease, the seller or lessor may not give or offer to give a rebate or discount or otherwise pay or offer to pay value to the consumer as an inducement for a sale or lease in consideration of the consumer giving to the seller or lessor the names of prospective purchasers or lessees, or otherwise aiding the seller or lessor in making a sale or lease to another person, if the earning of the rebate, discount, or other value is contingent upon the occurrence of an event subsequent to the time the consumer agrees to buy or lease. If a consumer is induced by a violation of this section to enter into a consumer credit sale or consumer lease, the agreement is unenforceable by the seller or lessor and the consumer, at his or her option, may rescind the agreement or retain the goods delivered and the benefit of any services performed without any obligation to pay for them.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1220, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-411, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-3-210. Discrimination prohibited - exemption.

A consumer credit transaction regulated by this code shall not be denied any person, nor shall terms and conditions be made more stringent, on the basis of discrimination, solely because of disability, race, creed, religion, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, marital status, national origin, or ancestry. This section does not apply to any consumer credit transaction made or denied by a seller, lessor, or lender whose total original unpaid balances arising from consumer credit transactions for the previous calendar year are less than one million dollars.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1220, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1598, § 10, effective May 29.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (HB 21-1108), ch. 156, p. 889, § 10, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-1-109, as it existed prior to 2000.

Cross references:

(1) For civil liability for discrimination, see § 5-5-206; for discrimination generally, see article 34 of title 24.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 341, Session Laws of Colorado 2008.

(3) For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1108, see section 1 of chapter 156, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.